scripts/mutation.script
#***** mutation.script *****
# Th. Fransen, 19/08/19
# Define two-level mutation symbols (transducers) and manipulate lower-level symbols
# This script also defines non-leniting anlaut consonants

echo >>> Opening 'mutation.script' ...

clear stack

echo >>> Defining mutation transducers ...

#\\\\\ LENITION /////

# Two-level symbols
define lenTwoLevel ["+LEN":"^LEN" ] ;

# Lower-level rules
define lenLower [
[ [..] -> h || "^LEN" [c|p|t] _ ] .o.
# No lenition with sc, sp, st, sm
[ s (->) ṡ || "^LEN" _ \[c|p|t|m] ] .o.
[ f (->) ḟ|0 || "^LEN" _ ] .o.
"^LEN" -> 0
] ;

#\\\\\ NASALISATION /////

# Two-level symbols
define nasTwoLevel ["+NAS":"^NAS"] ;

# Lower-level rules
define nasLower [
[ m (->) {mm} , n (->) {nn} , r (->) {rr} , l (->) {ll} || 
"^NAS" _ ] .o.
[ [..] -> [n|ṅ] "-" || "^NAS" _ Vow ] .o.
[ [..] -> [n|ṅ] 	|| "^NAS" _ d|g ] .o.
[ [..] -> m || "^NAS" _ b] .o.
"^NAS" -> 0
] ;

#\\\\\ H-MUTATION /////

# Two-level symbols
define hTwoLevel ["+H":"^H"] ;

# Lower-level rules
define hLower [ [ c (->) {cc} , d (->) {dd} , f (->) {ff} , g (->) {gg} , l (->) {ll} , m (->) {mm} , n (->) {nn} , p (->) {pp} , r (->) {rr} , s (->) {ss} , t (->) {tt} || "^H" _ ] .o.
"^H" -> 0 ] ;

#\\\\\ UNION MUTATION TRANSDUCERS AND REPLACE RULES /////

define mutTwoLevel [ lenTwoLevel | nasTwoLevel | hTwoLevel ] ;

# Lower
define mutLower [ lenLower .o. nasLower .o. hLower .o. [ "^LEN"|"^NAS"|"^H" -> 0 ] ] ;

#\\\\\ NON-LEN. ANLAUT CONSONANTS /////

define nonLenAnlaut [ 
[ m -> {mm} , n -> {nn} , r -> {rr} , l -> {ll} || .#. _ ] ] ;
